Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2013.01
Licensed health care professional, defined.

Licensed health care professional means a physician, an osteopathic physician, or a physician assistant licensed pursuant to the Uniform Credentialing Act.

Laws 2022, LB905, § 10.